Utah statutes.
53-5a-102.   Uniform firearm laws.
(1)  The individual right to keep and bear arms being a constitutionally
protected right under Article I, Section 6 of the Utah Constitution, the
Legislature finds the need to provide uniform civil and criminal firearm laws
throughout the state.
(2)  Except as specifically provided by state law, a local authority or state
entity may not:
(a)  prohibit an individual from owning, possessing, purchasing, selling,
transferring, transporting, or keeping a firearm at the individual's place of
residence, property, business, or in any vehicle lawfully in the individual's
possession or lawfully under the individual's control; or
(b)  require an individual to have a permit or license to purchase, own,
possess, transport, or keep a firearm.
(3)  In conjunction with Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 5, Weapons, this section
is uniformly applicable throughout this state and in all its political
subdivisions and municipalities.
(4)  All authority to regulate firearms is reserved to the state except where
the Legislature specifically delegates responsibility to local authorities or
state entities.
(5)  Unless specifically authorized by the Legislature by statute, a local
authority or state entity may not enact, establish, or enforce any ordinance,
regulation, rule, or policy pertaining to firearms that in any way inhibits or
restricts the possession or use of firearms on either public or private
property.
(6)  As used in this section:
(a)  "firearm" has the same meaning as defined in Subsection 76-10-501(9); and
(b)  "local authority or state entity" includes public school districts,
public schools, and state institutions of higher education.
(7)  Nothing in this section restricts or expands private property rights.
